Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1409
Commission; officers; meetings; quorum.

(1) The members of the commission shall annually elect a chairperson and vice-chairperson from among their members.

(2) The commission shall hold regular meetings at times determined by the commission. Special or additional meetings may be held on the call of the chairperson or upon the call of at least three members. A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum at all meetings. Commission action on any item shall require a majority of those present at meetings in which there is a quorum, except that adoption of the comprehensive statewide plan, or any changes or alternatives thereto, required by section 85-1413 and approval or disapproval of a new program or disapproval of an existing program pursuant to section 85-1414 shall require the concurrence of a majority of the members.

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 12;

Laws 1994, LB 683, § 17;

Laws 1999, LB 816, § 12;

Laws 2006, LB 196, § 3.